Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-202.23
Disabled or blind honorably discharged veteran; terms, defined.

As used in sections 77-202.23 and 77-202.24, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Disabled veteran has the same meaning as in 5 U.S.C. 2108, as such section existed on January 1, 2025; and

(2) Blind veteran means a veteran whose sight is so defective as to seriously limit such veteran's ability to engage in the ordinary vocations and activities of life.

Laws 1971, LB 990, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 273, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB650, § 11.